Arkansas, session 2025, HB1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Noninvasive Ventilators

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Enrollee" means an individual entitled to coverage of
healthcare services from a healthcare insurer;
(2)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan, policy,
or contract for healthcare services issued, renewed, or extended in this
state by a healthcare insurer, health maintenance organization, hospital
medical service corporation, or self-insured governmental or church plan in
this state; and
(ii) Any health benefit program receiving state or
*ANS167*
01/30/2025 11:01:38 AM ANS167

HB1321
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Plans providing health benefits to state and
public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) Medical payments under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan other than a cancer
insurance plan or cancer supplemental policy; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan;
(3)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an insurance company, hospital
and medical service corporation, health maintenance organization, or a
nonprofit agricultural membership organization as defined in § 23-60-104 that
issues or delivers health benefit plans in this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(4) "Healthcare professional" means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession;
and
01/30/2025 11:01:38 AM ANS167

HB1321
(5) "Healthcare service" means an item or service provided to an
individual for the purposes of alleviating, curing, healing, or preventing
human illness, injury, or physical disability.

23-79-2902. Step therapy or fail first protocols prohibited.
(a) A healthcare insurer shall not require step therapy protocols or
fail first protocols of a lesser device or healthcare service for a
prescription or order of a healthcare professional for a noninvasive
ventilator if:
(1) The noninvasive ventilator requires frequent or substantial
servicing as classified by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services and
determined by a healthcare professional;
(2) There is clinical evidence or enrollee history that suggests
the alternative treatments required under the step therapy protocol or fail
first protocol will:
(A) Be less effective for an enrollee; or
(B) Cause an adverse reaction to the enrollee; or
(3) The noninvasive ventilator is deemed medically necessary by
the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall require
Medicaid managed care organizations to reimburse for a noninvasive ventilator
at no less than one hundred percent (100%) of the fee schedule of the
Arkansas Medicaid Program for a ventilator.

23-79-2903. Rules.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner may develop and promulgate rules for
the implementation and administration of this subchapter.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services may develop and
promulgate rules for the implementation and administration of this subchapter
that may apply to the Arkansas Medicaid Program or the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.
(c) The State Board of Finance may develop and promulgate rules for
the administration of this subchapter for the plans providing health benefits
to state and public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.

01/30/2025 11:01:38 AM ANS167